Nevada, session 83, SB261.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 40 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. In lieu of the remedy provided in NRS 40.290 to
40.420, inclusive, when a person is guilty of forcible entry or
forcible detainer of a dwelling on real property, the owner of the
real property, an authorized representative of the owner or the
occupant who is authorized by the owner to be in possession of
the real property may seek to recover possession of the dwelling by
submitting a written complaint on the form prescribed by
subsection 2 to request that the sheriff of the county in which the
real property at issue is located remove the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant if:
(a) The real property was not open to the public at the time the
forcible entry or forcible detainer occurred;
(b) The owner of the real property, or an authorized
representative of the owner or the occupant who is authorized by
the owner to be in possession of the real property directed the
unlawful or unauthorized occupant who forcibly entered or
detained the real property to surrender the real property;
(c) The unlawful or unauthorized occupant is not:
(1) The current or former tenant of the dwelling on the real
property;
(2) An owner or a co-owner of the real property and is not
listed on the title to the real property, unless the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant has engaged in title fraud; or
(3) An immediate family member of the owner of the real
property; and
(d) There is no pending litigation related to the real property
between the owner of the real property and the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant, if the identity of the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant is known.
2. A complaint made pursuant to subsection 1 must be in
substantially the following form:

COMPLAINT TO REMOVE PERSON WHO FORCIBLY
ENTERED OR DETAINED DWELLING

I, the owner of the real property or the authorized
representative of the owner or the occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real
property located at .........., declare under the penalty of
perjury that:
-
*SB261*

– 4 –
1. .......... I am the owner of the real property or the
authorized representative of the owner or the occupant who
is authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real
property.
2. .......... I purchased the property on .........., or I
became the authorized representative of the owner or an
occupant who is authorized by the owner to be in possession
of the real property on ..........
3. .......... The real property contains a dwelling.
4. .......... An unlawful or unauthorized occupant
forcibly entered or detained the dwelling and continues to
occupy the real property.
5. .......... The real property was not open to the public
at the time the forcible entry or detainer occurred.
6. .......... I directed the unlawful or unauthorized
occupant to surrender the real property and the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant has not surrendered the real
property.
7. .......... The unlawful or unauthorized occupant is not
a current or former tenant of the dwelling on the real
property.
8. .......... The unlawful or unauthorized occupant is not
an owner or a co-owner of the real property and is not listed
on the title to the real property, unless the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant has engaged in title fraud.
9. .......... The unlawful or unauthorized occupant is not
an immediate family member of the owner of the real
property.
10. .......... There is no pending litigation related to the
real property between the owner of the real property and the
unlawful or unauthorized occupant, if the identity of
the unlawful or unauthorized occupant is known.
11. .......... I understand that a person or persons
removed from the real property pursuant to this procedure
may bring a cause of action against me for any false
statements made in this complaint or for unlawfully using
this procedure and that as a result of such action, I may be
held liable for actual damages, penalties, costs and
reasonable attorney’s fees.
12. .......... I am requesting the sheriff remove the
unlawful or unauthorized occupant from the real property.
13. .......... A copy of my valid government-issued
identification card is attached and, if I am the authorized
representative of the owner or the occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real
-
*SB261*

– 5 –
property, documents evidencing my authority to act on
behalf of the owner of the real property are attached.

I HAVE READ AND INITIALED EVERY STATEMENT
IN THIS PETITION AND EACH STATEMENT IS TRUE
AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE
STATEMENTS MADE IN THIS PETITION ARE BEING
MADE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY, WHICH IS
PUNISHABLE AS A CATEGORY D FELONY AS
PROVIDED IN NRS 199.120.

.........................................................................
Signature of the owner of the real property or an authorized
representative of the owner or the occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real
property

3. When a sheriff receives a completed complaint made
pursuant to subsection 1, the sheriff shall verify that the person
who submitted the complaint is the owner of the real property or
an authorized representative of the owner or the occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real property
and that the petition satisfies the other requirements of this
section. After the sheriff verifies the complaint, the sheriff shall
serve a notice to vacate on the unlawful or unauthorized occupant
and return possession of the real property to the owner of the real
property. Service may be made by hand-delivering the notice to an
unlawful or unauthorized occupant or by posting the notice on the
front door or entrance of the dwelling. While serving the notice,
the sheriff shall take reasonable steps to verify the identity of each
person occupying the dwelling and make a note of each identity on
the return of service. If appropriate, the sheriff may arrest any
person found in the dwelling for trespass, outstanding warrants or
any other legal cause.
4. The sheriff may collect the same fee for service of the
notice to vacate as if the sheriff were serving a writ of possession
or restitution under NRS 248.275.
5. After the sheriff serves the notice to vacate, the owner of
the real property or an authorized representative of the owner or
the occupant who is authorized by the owner to be in possession
of the real property may request that the sheriff remain at the real
property to keep the peace while the owner of the real property or
an authorized representative of the owner or the occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real property
changes the locks or removes the personal property of the
-
*SB261*

– 6 –
unlawful or unauthorized occupant from the premises. If the
sheriff remains at the request of the owner of the real property or
an authorized representative of the owner or the occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real property,
the sheriff may charge a reasonable hourly rate, and the person
requesting that the sheriff remain shall pay the reasonable hourly
rate of the sheriff.
6. Any fees collected pursuant to this section must be
accounted for as provided in subsection 6 of NRS 248.275.
7. The sheriff is not liable to the unlawful or unauthorized
occupant or any other person for loss, destruction or damage of
property.
8. The owner of the real property or an authorized
representative of the owner or the occupant who is authorized by
the owner to be in possession of the real property is not liable to
the unlawful or unauthorized occupant or any other person for
loss, destruction or damage of property.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the rights
of an owner of real property or the authority of a sheriff to
perform his or her duties.
Sec. 3. 1. The Administrator of the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry shall prescribe by regulation
the content of and instructions for completing a form that a seller
of real property may use to authorize a local law enforcement
agency to enter if a person has forcibly entered or detained a
dwelling on the real property. The form must include instructions
for the submission of a completed form to the appropriate local
law enforcement agency. If a seller submits a completed form to
the local law enforcement agency, the local law enforcement
agency may enter the dwelling and notify the person that he or she
must surrender the property in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 40.290 to 40.420, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, as
applicable.
2. The Administrator may consult with sheriffs and other
local law enforcement officials in this State regarding the contents
of the form described in subsection 1.
3. The Administrator shall:
(a) Distribute copies of the form to local law enforcement
agencies in this State; and
(b) Make copies available for title companies, real estate
brokers and real estate salespersons in this State.
4. A title company, real estate broker or real estate
salesperson shall distribute the form prescribed by the
Administrator pursuant to subsection 1 at the time a parcel of real
property is listed for sale.
-
*SB261*

– 7 –
5. A local law enforcement agency may distribute the form
prescribed by the Administrator pursuant to subsection 1 at any
time.
6. As used in this section, “local law enforcement agency”
means:
(a) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(b) A metropolitan police department; or
(c) A police department of an incorporated city.
Sec. 4. NRS 40.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.215 As used in NRS 40.215 to 40.425, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context requires otherwise:
1. “Dwelling” or “dwelling unit” means a structure or part
thereof that is occupied, or designed or intended for occupancy, as a
residence or sleeping place by one person who maintains a
household or by two or more persons who maintain a common
household.
2. “Landlord’s agent” means a person who is hired or
authorized by the landlord or owner of real property to manage the
property or dwelling unit, to enter into a rental agreement on behalf
of the landlord or owner of the property or who serves as a person
within this State who is authorized to act for and on behalf of the
landlord or owner for the purposes of service of process or receiving
notices and demands. A landlord’s agent may also include a
successor landlord or a property manager as defined in
NRS 645.0195.
3. “Mobile home” means every vehicle, including equipment,
which is constructed, reconstructed or added to in such a way as to
have an enclosed room or addition occupied by one or more persons
as a residence or sleeping place and which has no foundation other
than wheels, jacks, skirting or other temporary support.
4. “Mobile home lot” means a portion of land within a mobile
home park which is rented or held out for rent to accommodate a
mobile home.
5. “Mobile home park” or “park” means an area or tract of land
where two or more mobile homes or mobile home lots are rented or
held out for rent. “Mobile home park” or “park” does not include
those areas or tracts of land, whether within or outside of a park,
where the lots are held out for rent on a nightly basis.
6. “Premises” includes a mobile home.
7. “Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular structure primarily
designed as temporary living quarters for travel, recreational or
camping use, which may be self-propelled or mounted upon or
drawn by a motor vehicle.
8. “Recreational vehicle lot” means a portion of land within a
recreational vehicle park, or a portion of land so designated within a
-
*SB261*

– 8 –
mobile home park, which is rented or held out for rent to
accommodate a recreational vehicle overnight or for less than 3
months.
9. “Recreational vehicle park” means an area or tract of land
where lots are rented or held out for rent to accommodate a
recreational vehicle overnight or for less than 3 months.
10. “Short-term tenancy” means a tenancy in which rent is
reserved by a period of 1 week and the tenancy has not continued
for more than 45 days.
Sec. 5. NRS 40.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.230 1. Every person is guilty of a forcible entry who
unlawfully enters any real property:
(a) By means of physical force resulting in damage to a structure
on the real property;
(b) By any kind of violence or circumstance of terror; or
(c) Peaceably or otherwise and:
(1) Thereafter prevents the owner of the real property from
access or occupancy of the property by changing a lock; or
(2) Turns out by force, threats of violence or menacing
conduct, the owner of the real property or an occupant who is
authorized by the owner to be in possession of the real property.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this act,
the owner of the real property, an authorized representative of the
owner or the occupant who is authorized by the owner to be in
possession of the real property may seek to recover possession of
the property pursuant to NRS 40.290 to 40.420, inclusive, after the
expiration of the notice to surrender served by the owner, authorized
representative of the owner or authorized occupant upon the person
who committed the forcible entry. The notice must:
(a) Inform the person who committed the forcible entry that he
or she is guilty of forcible entry; and
(b) Afford the person who committed the forcible entry 4
judicial days to surrender the property.
3. If an owner of real property or an authorized representative
of the owner recovers damages for a forcible entry, judgment may
be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages
are assessed. As used in this section, “actual damages” means
damages to real property and personal property.
Sec. 6. NRS 40.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.240 1. Every person is guilty of a forcible detainer who
either:
(a) Unlawfully holds and keeps the possession of any real
property by force or threats of violence, or whether the possession
was acquired peaceably or otherwise; or
-
*SB261*

– 9 –
(b) Enters any real property without the authority of the owner
of the property, an authorized representative of the owner or an
occupant who is authorized by the owner to be in possession of the
real property and who, after receiving written notice to surrender
pursuant to subsection 2 [,] or a notice to vacate pursuant to
section 2 of this act, fails to surrender the property.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this act,
the owner of the real property, an authorized representative of the
owner or the occupant who is authorized by the owner to be in
possession of the real property may seek to recover possession of
the property pursuant to NRS 40.290 to 40.420, inclusive, after the
expiration of the notice to surrender served by the owner or
authorized occupant upon the person who committed the forcible
detainer. The notice must:
(a) Inform the person who committed the forcible detainer that
he or she is guilty of a forcible detainer; and
(b) Afford the person who committed the forcible detainer 4
judicial days to surrender the property.
3. If an owner of real property or an authorized representative
of the owner recovers damages for a forcible detainer, judgment
may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual
damages are assessed. As used in this section, “actual damages”
means damages to real property and personal property.
Sec. 7. NRS 248.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
248.320 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of NRS
482.2155 [,] and section 2 of this act, no other fees shall be charged
by sheriffs than those specifically set forth in this chapter, nor shall
fees be charged for any other services than those mentioned in this
chapter.
Sec. 8. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 9. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1, 2 and 4 to 8, inclusive, of this act become
effective on October 1, 2025.
3. Section 3 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB261*